Utah statutes.
76-5-209.   Homicide by assault -- Penalty.

(1)  A person commits homicide by assault if, under circumstances not amounting to aggravated murder, murder, or manslaughter, a person causes the death of another while intentionally or knowingly attempting, with unlawful force or violence, to do bodily injury to another.

(2)  Homicide by assault is a third degree felony.



Enacted by Chapter 291, 1995 General Session

